Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.221

Distribution in-kind.

A member, regardless of the nature of the member's contribution, has no right to receive any distribution from a limited liability company in any form other than money. A limited liability company may distribute an asset in kind to the extent that each member receives a percentage of the asset equal to the member's percentage share of distributions.

[ 2015 c 188 s 44.]